Louisiana, session 2026, HB384.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of United States Highway 11 in Slidell, Louisiana, St.
Tammany Parish, between Carollo Drive and Kostmayer Avenue, shall be known and is
hereby designated as the "Dan DeBlanc American Hero Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual cost for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of two thousand two hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1